Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Cross references. —

As to eminent domain, see §§

1-26-501

through

1-26-817

and Rule 71.1, W.R.C.P.

As to employees being allowed time off from work to vote, see §

22-2-111

.

As to employer interference with employee's political rights, see §§

22-26-116

through

22-26-118

.

As to licensing partnerships, associations or corporations as real estate brokers and salesmen, see §§

33-28-102

and

33-28-106

through

33-28-124

.

As to duty of director of the department of environmental quality to advise, consult and cooperate with corporations, partnerships and other business associations, see §

35-11-109

.

As to power of companies, associations and corporations operating irrigation systems to levy and collect assessments for cost of operation, see §

36-7-326

.

As to discrimination in connection with trade and commerce, see chapter 4 of title 40.

Revision of title. —

Laws 1989, ch. 201, §§ 1 and 2, Laws 1989, ch. 249, §§ 1 through 3, and Laws 1989, ch. 269, § 1, revised this title, effective January 1, 1990.

Laws 1989, ch. 201, § 1, added chapter 17 (§§

17-17-101

through

17-17-151

).

Laws 1989, ch. 201, § 2, amended §

17-3-101

.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1, added chapter 16 (§§

17-16-101

through
17-16-1803).

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 2, amended §

17-15-132

, and amended and renumbered former §§

17-1-803

, 17-1-804,

17-1-1101

, 17-1-1102, and

17-2-101

through 17-2-104, as present §§

17-16-1630

through 17-16-1633 and

17-16-1701

through

17-16-1720

.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 3, repealed §§

17-1-101

through 17-1-719 and

17-1-901

through

17-1-101

1, and amended § 17-2-102.

Laws 1989, ch. 269, § 1, added chapter 18 (§§

17-18-101

through

17-18-206

).

Laws 1989, ch. 269, § 2, provides: “The legislature finds that W.S.

17-18-104

is modeled from the Delaware Antitakeover Law, Chapter 204, Section 203, Delaware Code (1988) and that W.S.

17-18-105

through

17-18-115

are modeled from the Indiana Code, Sections 23-2-3.1-1 through 23-2-3.1-11 (1988) and that case law interpreting the Delaware and Indiana statutes should be used in interpreting the corresponding Wyoming statutes.”

No detailed explanation of the changes made by the 1989 acts has been attempted, but, where appropriate, historical citations to former provisions have been added to corresponding sections, and annotations to cases decided under former provisions have been placed under comparable sections where it was felt that they would be useful. For table of revised and renumbered sections, see Volume 11 of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 4, provides: “The legislature finds that this act is modeled from the Revised Model Business Corporation Act that was adopted by the Committee on Corporate Laws of the American Bar Association in 1984 and that the comments to the model act should be used in interpreting this act.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What corporate communications are entitled to attorney-client privilege—modern cases, 27 ALR5th 76.